Louisiana, session 2026, HB609.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1165.1(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1165.1. Healthcare information; records
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, no
healthcare provider, healthcare facility, or custodian of healthcare information shall
charge any fee for the preparation, reproduction, handling, or transmission of
medical records when such records are requested by or on behalf of a veteran for the
sole purpose of submitting a claim for disability benefits administered by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Louisiana Department of Veterans
Affairs.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, "veteran" has the same meaning as
provided in R.S. 13:5364.
(3) The exemption provided in this Subsection shall apply only once per
veteran and shall not apply to any subsequent request for medical records regardless
of purpose.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 609 ENROLLED
(4) A healthcare provider or custodian may require reasonable documentation
establishing veteran status and that the request is made in connection with a
disability benefits claim prior to applying the exemption.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.